Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2204
Error in platting; application; district court; hearing; order; appeal.

If the court finds that the allegations of the application are true and that the conditions set forth in section 19-2201 exist, a decree shall be entered correcting any errors or omissions in the platting and annexation of the territory, reestablishing the corporate limits of the city or village, and barring any future challenge of the validity of the proceedings. A certified copy of the decree shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the territory lies. Appeals may be taken from the district court to the Court of Appeals as in other civil actions.

Laws 1955, c. 60, § 4, p. 192;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 23.